Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,232
Forcible entry and detainer; judgment; future action not barred.

Judgments obtained under sections 25-21,219 to 25-21,235 shall not be a bar to any future action brought by either party.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 119, p. 310;

C.S.1929, § 22-1203;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,120;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 70;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-570;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 12.

Forcible entry and detainer does not try the question of title, but only the immediate right of possession. An action of forcible entry and detainer is res judicata only as to the immediate right. Hogan v. Pelton, 210 Neb. 530, 315 N.W.2d 644 (1982).